California, session 20252026, AB1691.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 36996) is added to Division 27 of the Public Resources Code, to read: CHAPTER 9. Copper-Based Antifouling Paint36996. (a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(1) The Department of Pesticide Regulation has been conducting studies for several years on the amount of dissolved copper, which is found in antifouling paint, that is discharged into California’s harbors, and the State Water Resources Control Board, regional water quality control boards, and the Department of Pesticide Regulation have issued regulations in an attempt to reduce the amount of dissolved copper that is discharged.(2) The requirements of this section are necessary to better coordinate the multiple jurisdictions with interests in, and regulatory authority over, the issue described in paragraph (1).(b) On or before January 1, 2029, the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall complete a reevaluation of copper-based antifouling boat paint products, and shall make the determination to retain, modify, or suspend its standards or to place new appropriate standards on the chemical composition or use of copper-based antifouling paint.(c) On or before June 1, 2028, the California Environmental Protection Agency, the State Water Resources Control Board, regional water quality control boards, and the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall collaborate on, and the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall finish and release, any active studies related to the effectiveness of low-leach-rate paint and elevated copper concentrations in saltwater harbors, bays, and marinas that are primarily a result of the use of copper-based antifouling paint within the state.(d) On or before January 1, 2029, the California Environmental Protection Agency, the State Water Resources Control Board, and the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall collaborate to determine the best methods to address elevated copper concentrations in saltwater harbors, bays, and marinas that are primarily a result of the use of copper-based antifouling paint within the state.(e) On or before January 1, 2029, the California Environmental Protection Agency shall post on its internet website the best methods to address elevated copper concentrations in saltwater harbors, bays, and marinas that are primarily a result of the use of copper-based antifouling paint, as determined by the collaborative process described in subdivision (d). The best methods may include, but are not limited to, guidelines for compliance and public workshops.